Utah statutes.
77-38-203.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Confidential communication" means information given to a sexual assault counselor by a victim and includes reports or working papers made in the course of the counseling relationship.

(2)  "Rape crisis center" means any office, institution, or center assisting victims of sexual assault and their families which offers crisis intervention, medical, and legal services, and counseling.

(3)  "Sexual assault counselor" means a person who is employed by or volunteers at a rape crisis center who has a minimum of 40 hours of training in counseling and assisting victims of sexual assault and who is under the supervision of the director or designee of a rape crisis center.

(4)  "Victim" means a person who has experienced a sexual assault of whatever nature including incest and rape and requests counseling or assistance regarding the mental, physical, and emotional consequences of the sexual assault.

